Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2

Boating Safety

69-9-201. Short title.

This chapter shall be cited as the “Tennessee Boating Safety Act of 1965.”

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2201; T.C.A. §69-10-201.

Cross-References. Boating under the influence, §69-9-217.

Exhaust mufflers on vessel engines, title 69, ch. 9, part 3.

69-9-202. Public policy.

It is the policy of the state to:

Promote the safety of persons and property in and connected with the use of vessels;

Achieve, so far as practicable, uniformity of laws, regulations, requirements, procedures and methods with respect to the numbering, operation and equipment of all vessels subject to this chapter;

Foster the development, use and enjoyment of all the waters of Tennessee; and

Attain the fullest possible cooperation of the various agencies of this state, the neighboring states and the federal government in connection with assistance and rescue operations, in the enforcement of laws and regulations, and in the education of the public as these activities relate to recreational boating safety.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2203; T.C.A. §69-10-202.

69-9-203. Enforcement and administration of chapter — Disposition of funds — Rewards for information on violations.

It is the sole duty and responsibility of the Tennessee wildlife resources agency to enforce and administer this chapter.

All expenses required for the administration and enforcement of this chapter shall be paid for with funds collected pursuant to this chapter. All moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the wildlife resources fund. The moneys shall be made available to the wildlife resources agency for the administration and enforcement of this chapter, as provided in this section, and for educational activities relating to boating safety and for no other purposes.

All moneys otherwise provided for pursuant to this chapter shall be made available to carry out the intent and purpose as set forth in this chapter in accordance with plans approved by the fish and wildlife commission. All such funds are hereby appropriated, reserved, set aside and made available until expended for the enforcement and administration of this chapter. The fish and wildlife commission is hereby authorized to adopt a plan or formula for the use of the moneys for employing and equipping such additional personnel as may be necessary for carrying out this chapter and for paying a proportionate share of the salaries, expense, and operational costs of existing personnel according to the time and effort expended by them in carrying out this chapter. Such plan or formula may be altered or amended from time to time by the commission as existing conditions may warrant.

No funds derived from the sale of hunting licenses or fishing licenses, or other wildlife resources funds shall be expended or diverted for carrying out this chapter.

The executive director is authorized to offer rewards or payments for information that may aid in the conviction of any offender violating a provision of this chapter or any other law relating to boating.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 20; 1975, ch. 87, § 1; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., § 70-2203; T.C.A. §69-10-203; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 9.

69-9-204. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means the wildlife resources agency;

“Anchored” means held in place in the water by an anchor;

“Boat” means any vessel:

Manufactured or used primarily for noncommercial use;

Leased, rented, or chartered to another for the latter's noncommercial use; or

Engaged in the carrying of six (6) or fewer passengers;

“Commission” means the fish and wildlife commission;

“Dealer” means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing, buying, selling or exchanging boats, either outright or on conditional sale, chattel mortgage or other such contract;

“Diver” means any person who is wholly or partially submerged in the waters of the state and who is equipped with a face mask and snorkel or underwater breathing apparatus;

“Divers-down flag” means a free-flying flag, red in color, with a white diagonal stripe that begins at the top staff-side corner of the flag and extends to the lower opposite corner. The width of the stripe must be twenty-five percent (25%) of the height of the flag;

“Drifting” means underway, but proceeding without use of engines, oars or sails, being carried along only by the tide, current or wind;

“Executive director” means the executive director of the wildlife resources agency;

“Fueling” means any stage of the fueling operation; primarily concerned with introduction of explosive or combustible vapors or liquids on board;

“Maneuvering” means changing of course, speed or similar boat handling action;

“Mooring” means the act of making fast or securing a boat with lines or anchors, and may also include the place where a boat is secured or made fast;

“Motorboat” means any vessel propelled by machinery, whether or not such machinery is the principal source of propulsion;

“Numbered vessel” means an undocumented vessel that is subject to issue or has been issued a certificate of number by the state;

“Operate” means to navigate, be in physical control of, or otherwise use a motorboat or a vessel;

“Operator” means the person who operates or has charge of the navigation or use of a motorboat or vessel;

“Overloading” means excessive loading of a vessel with equipment or persons that causes instability, limited maneuverability, dangerously reduced freeboard or other similar conditions;

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a motorboat or vessel. “Owner” includes a person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat or vessel subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but “owner” excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity;

“Registration” means satisfying the requirements for registration prescribed by the commission;

“Restricted visibility” means any condition in which visibility is restricted by fog, mist, falling snow, heavy rainstorms or any other similar causes;

“Rules of the road” means statutory and regulatory rules governing navigation of vessels;

“Sailboat or auxiliary sailboat” means a vessel intended to be propelled primarily by sail, regardless of size or type;

“State of principal use” means the state on whose waters a vessel is used, whether moored or underway, or to be used most during a calendar year;

“Serious injury” means an injury that requires, or should have required, medical treatment by a physician beyond first aid;

“Underwater breathing apparatus” means any apparatus, whether self-contained or connected to a distant source of air or gas, whereby a person wholly or partially submerged in the water is enabled to obtain air or other gases for breathing without returning to the surface of the water;

“Underway” means a vessel that is not anchored, moored or aground;

“Use” means to operate, navigate or employ;

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water;

“Vessel length” means the distance from the vessel's forward end to the after end across the deck down the centerline, excluding the sheer and disregarding bowsprits, bumkins, rudders, outboard motors or similar fittings; and

“Waters of Tennessee” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state, except privately owned ponds or lakes not used for commercial purposes.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 4; 1974, ch. 719, § 1; 1975, ch. 87, § 2; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 5-7; T.C.A., § 70-2204; Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 1; 1989, ch. 92, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. §69-10-204; Acts 2007, ch. 185, §§ 2-4; 2012, ch. 993, § 10.

Cross-References. Divers-down flags, minimum size, §69-9-402.

69-9-205. Duties of executive director.

The executive director shall:

Plan, and submit to the commission, programs for the education of the public in boating safety, for the assignment of identification numbers to motorboats, for the regulation of vessels subject to this chapter, and for the enforcement of this chapter including related cooperation with other agencies and commissions of this state or any political subdivision of other agencies and commissions and with officials of other states and federal government;

Make and develop plans, within the limits of available income, for the improvement and promotion of all the waters of Tennessee for recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, the improvement of waterways through the deepening of channels, the acquisition and development of access areas and the removal of obstructions; and

Perform such additional educational, administrative and enforcement duties as the commission may lawfully assign.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 5; 1975, ch. 184, § 8; T.C.A., § 70-2205; T.C.A. §69-10-205.

69-9-206. Identification numbers for vessels — Exceptions.

Every vessel propelled by sail or machinery, or both, upon the waters of Tennessee shall be numbered for identification in accordance with this chapter and the regulations of the commission except:

A vessel that has a valid document issued by the bureau of customs of the United States, or any federal agency successor to the bureau of customs must be registered with the agency but is not required to display the identification numbers on the vessel;

A vessel with a valid number awarded to it pursuant to federal law or a federally-approved numbering system of another state; unless Tennessee has become the state of principal use and the vessel has been in Tennessee for sixty (60) days;

A vessel from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of Tennessee;

A vessel that is owned by the United States government, a state, or political subdivision of the United States government or a state that is used in the public service;

A ship's lifeboat;

A motorboat belonging to a class of boats that has been exempted from numbering by the commission after the agency has found that the numbering of motorboats of such class will not materially aid in their identification; and, if an agency of the federal government has a numbering system applicable to the class of motorboats to which the motorboat in question belongs, after the commission has further found that the motorboat would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to the federal law; or

A vessel that is owned by any volunteer rescue squad and used solely in emergency or rescue work and not for private, personal, recreation, or business use.

Every such exempt vessel under subsection (a) shall prominently display identification by name on the vessel.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 6; 1969, ch. 313, § 1; 1972, ch. 616, § 1; 1974, ch. 719, § 2; 1979, ch. 36, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2206; Acts 2001, ch. 249, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-206.

Cross-References. Penalty for alteration of permanent serial numbers on watercraft, §39-14-134.

Tax exemption for sales or leases of motor vehicles, boats, motor boats and other vessels, §§67-6-343,67-6-345.

69-9-207. Issuance of certificates of number — Fees — Renewal.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any vessel on the waters of Tennessee unless the vessel is numbered in accordance with this chapter.

The owner of every vessel required to be numbered by this chapter shall file an application for a number with the agency on forms approved by the executive director. The application shall be signed by the owner, or owners, of the vessel and shall be accompanied by the fee as set forth in this part. In situations involving abandoned or salvaged vessels, the fee shall be the same as set forth in this part; however, the applicant shall follow procedures as set out in rules and regulations.

Upon receipt of the application in approved form, the agency shall issue to the applicant a certificate of number, which shall contain the identification number issued to the vessel and such additional information as the commission may, by regulation, prescribe. The certificate shall be pocket-sized and shall be available for inspection when the vessel is in operation. The owner shall paint on or attach the identification number to each side of the bow of the vessel for which issued, displaying it in the manner required by the regulations of the commission and maintaining it in legible condition.

Certificates shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from date of issue; provided, that certificates shall be issued for periods up to three (3) years upon application of the owner. The fee to be collected for certificates shall be as follows:

Fee Category 1 Year 2 Years 3 Years Vessels less than 16 feet $ 4.00 $ 7.00 $10.00 Vessels 16 feet to less than 26 feet 8.00 14.00 20.00 Vessels 26 feet to less than 40 feet 12.00 21.00 30.00 Vessels 40 feet or more 16.00 28.00 40.00 Dealer's Certificate 10.00 ——— ——— Duplicate Certificate 2.00 ——— ———

Click to view table.

The fees levied pursuant to subsection (d) prior to June 13, 1997, shall continue to be levied as provided in such subsection. The commission is authorized to adjust such fees by regulation in such amount as may be necessary to administer this chapter; provided, that the percentage increase for any such fee adjustment shall not exceed the percent of increase in the average consumer price index all items-city average as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, since the last change in such fees. All such fees, and any adjustments to the fees, shall be deposited in the wildlife resources fund and shall be expended solely for the administration and operation of the commission's programs and responsibilities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

The agency shall be the office of records for all transactions and transfers of vessels numbered in this state.

The numbering system to be used shall conform to the numbering system promulgated by the federal government.

An owner of two (2) or more vessels that are subject to the requirements of this chapter and that are used as rental vessels in connection with the operation of a commercial boat dock shall, upon payment of the prescribed fee for each such vessel and upon the owner's written request for a blanket certificate, be entitled to have issued a blanket certificate of number covering all of the vessels for which fee is paid. The same vessel identification number followed by a dash (—) and a different suffix number for each vessel shall be painted on or attached to the bow of each such vessel, as provided in this section. In addition, the name of the boat dock or the owner of each such vessel shall be prominently displayed on the vessel as is provided in § 69-9-206 for exempt vessels.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 7; 1969, ch. 313, § 2; 1970, ch. 380, § 1; 1971, ch. 10, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 456, § 1; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 9, 10; 1979, ch. 292, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2207; Acts 1997, ch. 411, § 3; 2000, ch. 830, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-207.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 411, § 1 provided that that act, which added present (e), shall be cited as the Comprehensive Boating Safety Act of 1997.

69-9-208. Who may issue certificates — Disposition of fees.

The agency will issue certificates of number directly or may authorize any official in the state, who is presently authorized to issue automobile license plates, to issue certificates of number. In conformity with this chapter and any rules and regulations that may be validly issued by the commission, the agency may assign to each issuing officer a block of numbers and certificates, for which upon issue, the issuing officer shall be allowed a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for each certificate issued by the issuing officer, which fee shall be retained by the issuing officer, except that, in counties where the issuing officer is on salary basis, the fee shall be paid into the county treasury.

All registration moneys, except the twenty-five cent (25¢) fee allowed as mentioned in subsection (a), shall be remitted monthly to the commission not later than ten (10) days after the first of each month.

Any unexpended sums in excess of costs of administration and enforcement that are available out of the moneys derived under this chapter shall be expended and used by the commission for the purposes of water safety education and improvement of noncommercial boating facilities in this state, and the acquisition and development of lands for boating purposes.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 8; 1975, ch. 87, § 3; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 11, 12; T.C.A., § 70-2208; T.C.A. §69-10-208.

69-9-209. Rules and regulations.

The commission shall establish uniform regulations governing the numbering, the safety equipment, and the operation of the vessels subject to this chapter so that any such vessel complying with the regulations may be operated with equal freedom, or under similar requirements, upon all the waters of Tennessee. Safety and operational regulations shall not be in conflict with federal laws and regulations applicable to such vessels upon the navigable waters of the United States that are within this state. The commission is authorized and directed to alter and amend its regulations as need be, from time to time, to prevent conflict with federal laws and regulations pertaining to vessels.

The commission is authorized to proclaim special rules and regulations governing the operation of vessels in special areas or under special conditions.

Notwithstanding the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, or any other law to the contrary, the executive director, with the concurrence of the commission, is specifically authorized to order the temporary suspension of the effectiveness of any rule or regulation governing the operation of vessels in special areas or under special conditions if the public health, safety and welfare, and the aquatic habitat can be reasonably protected. The temporary suspension of such rules or regulations may be by proclamation, and shall not be subject to the rulemaking and publication provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The executive director shall ensure that adequate public notice of such temporary suspension of the rules is given. Whenever possible, the executive director shall transmit written notice of the order to suspend temporarily the rules to the secretary of state for publication in the notice section of the monthly administrative register.

Such rules and regulations of the commission as are authorized for this chapter shall be published at least one (1) time in newspapers whose circulation generally covers the areas affected by the rules and regulations. The publication of the rules and regulations is required to be at least fifteen (15) days before the terms of the rules and regulations will become effective. A copy of all rules and regulations passed by the commission shall be immediately filed with the secretary of state and the county clerks for the counties affected. The commission may conduct a public hearing on proposed rules or regulations.

No municipality, or other local authority, shall establish any regulation of a local nature not in conformity with state regulations authorized in this section.

On any proposed regulation affecting the equipment or operation, or both, of any vessel subject to this chapter, the commission may solicit the advice or opinions of representative boating associations, yacht clubs, and local, state or federal officials or agencies having knowledge or experience with the subject of the proposed regulations.

The commission shall provide regulations to govern:

Reports to be made and action required in case of accident;

Reporting the destruction, sale, or transfer of ownership of numbered vessels;

Reporting the change of address of owner of a numbered vessel;

Special numbers for use by manufacturers or dealers for the demonstration or transportation of vessels;

The issuance of certificates for boats from other states using the waters of Tennessee for more than sixty (60) days. For the purposes of this subdivision (f)(5), where such a vessel is in Tennessee solely for wet or dry storage or repairs, or both, the length of time that such vessel is in Tennessee for such purposes shall not be counted;

Safety equipment, lights and operations not inconsistent with federal laws;

Cooperation with local governments and federal authority for special events or to meet emergency situations;

Issuance of special numbers to owners of fleets of boats for hire or rent;

Equipment and activities associated with commercial boating; and

Abandoned and salvaged vessels.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 10; 1974, ch. 719, § 3; 1975, ch. 87, §§ 5-7; T.C.A., § 70-2210; Acts 1990, ch. 694, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-209; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 5.

69-9-210. Reporting of boating accidents — Rendering of assistance.

Whenever any vessel operating upon the waters of Tennessee is involved in an accident, it is the duty of the operator, so far as the operator can do so without serious danger to the operator's own passengers, guests, crew, the operator or the operator's vessel, to render to all other persons affected by the accident such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or to minimize any danger caused by the accident. The operator shall also give the operator's name, address, and identifying information regarding the operator's vessel, to any person injured or to the owner of any property damaged in the accident.

Whenever an accident involves any vessel and results in the death, disappearance, or serious injury of any person, or in property damage in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000), as estimated by the wildlife officer or operator, or complete loss of vessel, the operator or operators of the vessel shall file, with the agency, a full description of the accident, including such information as the commission may by regulation require, within the times prescribed in subsection (c).

The agency shall be immediately notified of any boating accident within the meaning of this chapter that occurs on the waters of Tennessee by the operator or operators of any vessel involved in the accident. An accident reported pursuant to subsection (b) shall be filed within forty-eight (48) hours of the occurrence of an accident if the accident has resulted in the death, disappearance, or serious injury of any person. An accident reported pursuant to subsection (b) that results in property damage shall be filed within ten (10) days. If the operator is incapable of making the required notice or report, it is the responsibility of each passenger to ensure that notification is made and any required report is filed in conformance with this subsection (c).

The report of a boating accident required to be made in this section shall not, during any judicial proceeding, be referred to in any way; it shall not be subject to subpoena nor admissible as evidence in any proceeding. Subject to these restrictions, information contained in a boating accident report and any statistical information based on the report will be made available upon request for official purposes to the United States coast guard and any federal agency successor to the coast guard. Any party or individual involved in a boating accident may obtain a copy of the report of the accident that has been filed by requesting same from the commission.

It is a Class A misdemeanor for any person to fail to stop or comply with the requirements of subsection (a) when the person knew or reasonably should have known that serious injury resulted from the accident.

It is a Class E felony for any person to fail to stop or comply with the requirements of subsection (a) when the person knew or reasonably should have known that death resulted from the accident.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 12; 1975, ch. 184, § 14; 1982, ch. 738, § 36; T.C.A., § 70-2212; Acts 1992, ch. 601, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-210; Acts 2007, ch. 185, §§ 6, 7; 2008, ch. 1194, § 1.

Cross-References. Giving false information regarding accidents, investigations, §69-9-216.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

69-9-211. Regattas and other special aquatic events.

The executive director may authorize the holding of regattas, motorboat or other boat races, marine parades, tournaments, exhibitions, or land-based events that are intended to be viewed from the water by vessel that impact navigation or the safety of vessels on any waters of this state. The commission shall adopt from time to time and amend regulations concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and persons on motorboats and vessels, either observers or participants.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the executive director is authorized to establish temporary zones and restrictions in connection with the authorization of a specific special aquatic event as provided for in subsection (c). The executive director shall ensure that adequate public notice of the temporary zones and restrictions is given.

Whenever a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, exhibition, or land-based event intended to be viewed from the water by vessel that impacts navigation or vessel safety is proposed to be held, the person in charge of the event, at least thirty (30) days prior to the event, shall file an application with the executive director for permission to hold such regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, exhibition, or land-based event intended to be viewed from the water by vessel that impacts navigation or vessel safety. The application shall set forth the date, time and location where it is proposed to hold such regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, exhibition, or land-based event intended to be viewed from the water by vessel that impacts navigation or vessel safety, and it shall not be conducted without authorization of the executive director in writing. For good cause shown, the executive director may waive the thirty (30) day requirement.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 15; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 15, 16; T.C.A., § 70-2215; Acts 1995, ch. 26, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. §69-10-211; Acts 2007, ch. 185, §§ 8, 9.

69-9-212. Regulation of motorboats carrying passengers for hire — Exception.

The commission is hereby authorized to establish rules, regulations and procedures for the inspection and approval of motorboats carrying passengers for hire and for the licensing of the operators of such vessels, but this part shall not apply to any vessel that holds a valid certificate of inspection issued by the United States coast guard, or any federal agency successor to the coast guard.

Any person holding a valid motorboat operator's license issued by the United States coast guard or any federal agency successor to the coast guard shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of this part.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 17; T.C.A., § 70-2217; T.C.A. §69-10-212.

69-9-213. Boat liveries.

The owner of a boat livery shall cause to be kept a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any vessel that is designed or permitted by the owner of the boat livery to be operated as a motorboat, and the identification number of the vessel. The record shall be preserved for at least six (6) months.

Neither the owner of a boat livery, nor the owner's agent or employee shall permit any motorboat or any vessel designed or permitted by the owner to be operated as a motorboat or sailboat to depart from the owner's premises unless it shall have been provided either by the owner or renter, with the equipment required by this chapter and any rules and regulations made pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 18; T.C.A., § 70-2218; T.C.A. §69-10-213.

69-9-214. Judicial notice of all published rules and regulations and proclamations.

Courts shall take judicial notice of all published rules and regulations and proclamations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 19; 1975, ch. 184, §§ 17, 18; T.C.A., § 70-2219; T.C.A. §69-10-214; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 10.

69-9-215. Liability of owners or operators.

The owner of a vessel, other than a bona fide person engaged in the business of renting boats or a person engaged in the business of selling, repairing or manufacturing boats, that loans a boat to a consumer or potential consumer on a temporary basis, shall be liable for any injury or damage occasioned by the negligent operation of that vessel, whether such negligence consists of a violation of the laws of this state, or neglecting to observe such ordinary care and such operation as the rules of the common law require.

The operator of a boat that has been rented from a person engaged in the business of renting boats or that is on temporary loan from a person engaged in the business of selling, repairing, or manufacturing boats shall be liable for any injury or damage occasioned by the negligent operation of that vessel, whether such negligence consists of a violation of the laws of this state or neglecting to observe such ordinary care and such operation as the rules of the common law require.

Nothing contained in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) shall prohibit the application of common law liability as a basis for liability of a bona fide person engaged in the business of renting boats or a person engaged in the business of selling, repairing or manufacturing boats that loans a boat to a consumer or potential consumer on a temporary basis for injury or damages occasioned by the negligent operation of that vessel.

The owner is not liable, however, unless such vessel is being used with the owner's express or implied consent. It shall be presumed that such vessel is being operated with the knowledge and consent of the owner, if at the time of the injury or damage, it is under the control of the owner's spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, or other immediate member of the owner's family.

In all actions for injury to persons or property caused by the negligent operation or use of any boat, vessel or motor propelled watercraft within this state, proof of ownership of such vessel shall be prima facie evidence that such vessel at the time of the cause of action was being operated and used with authority, consent and knowledge of the owner in the transaction out of which such injury or cause of action arose, and such proof of ownership likewise shall be prima facie evidence that such vessel was being operated by the owner, or by the owner's servant, for the owner's use and benefit and within the course and scope of the servant's employment. The prima facie evidence provisions of this subdivision (b)(2) shall also apply in cases of the negligent operation of a vessel being test-driven by a prospective purchaser with the knowledge and consent of the seller or the seller's agent whether or not the seller or the seller's agent is present in the vessel at the time of the alleged negligent operation. This section is intended to be remedial and it is the legislative intent that it be given a liberal construction.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to relieve any other person from any liability that that person would otherwise have, but nothing contained in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit any recovery in excess of injury or damage actually incurred.

This chapter shall not be construed to affect any rights accorded owners under the laws of the United States.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, § 20; T.C.A., § 70-2220; T.C.A. §69-10-215; Acts 2005, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2.

69-9-216. Prohibited acts.

No person shall operate or interfere with the safe operation of any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person. Notwithstanding § 69-9-219 to the contrary, any person who interferes with the safe operation of any motorboat or vessel in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person commits a Class C misdemeanor; provided, that any person who through such interference causes bodily injury or death commits a Class A misdemeanor.

It is unlawful for any person less than twelve (12) years of age to operate any vessel propelled by machinery upon the waters of Tennessee unless the person is under the direct supervision of an adult. This prohibition does not apply if the person is operating a vessel powered by a motor of eight and one-half (8.5) horsepower or less.

For the purpose of this subsection (b), “direct supervision” means being in such proximity with the operator so as to be able to take immediate control of the vessel.

Such supervising adult shall be jointly liable with the owner of a vessel as provided in § 69-9-215.

Any person who operates a motorboat towing any person riding or attempting to ride upon one (1) or more water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device on the waters of the state shall have present in such vessel a person or persons, twelve (12) years of age or older, other than the operator, who shall at all times observe the progress of the person being towed and the operator of the towing vessel shall at all times maintain an alert lookout ahead. This provision does not apply to motorboats equipped with not less than a one hundred seventy degree (170°) wide angle rear-view mirror affixed in such a manner as will permit the operator to observe the progress of the person being towed.

No person shall ride or attempt to ride upon water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device, or use or operate any vessel to tow any person on the waters of the state between sunset and sunrise and during periods of restricted visibility, except upon special permit issued by the agency.

Any person riding or attempting to ride upon one (1) or more water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device, shall wear an adequate and effective life preserver, buoyant vest, or life belt filled with kapok, styrofoam, or cork, except upon special permit issued by the agency. Any operator of a vessel towing any person on water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device who is not wearing a life preserver, buoyant vest or life belt as prescribed in this subdivision (c)(3) is deemed in violation of this section.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to install, or maintain any structure, or inclined platform known as a water ski jump on the waters of the state and it is unlawful for any person to use such platform, or structure for the purpose of water ski jumping, except upon special permit issued by the agency.

This subsection (c) does not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person or persons engaged in an activity authorized by the agency.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device, or any person on the water skis, surfboard, tube, specialty recreational device or similar device, to collide with or strike against any object or person.

No person, except an authorized representative of the federal government, the state, or any of its political subdivisions, shall use or operate a siren on the waters of this state.

No person shall purposely sever the mooring lines, set adrift, injure, or damage in any manner any vessel that is moored, docked, buoyed, or tied up on the waters of the state, or purposely alter, injure, damage or destroy any buoys, markers, aids or lights placed, erected, or installed, for the safe operation of vessels upon the waters of this state.

No person shall knowingly or purposefully give false information to the executive director or the executive director's officers or designees during an accident investigation or while checking for compliance with this chapter.

Except to the extent permitted by federal law and in order to protect the health and safety of persons using the waters of the state, it is unlawful for any person to operate or use a vessel capable of discharging untreated sewage from such vessel into the waters of this state. It is also unlawful to discharge any treated or untreated sewage into any waters of the state lawfully designated as “no discharge.” Such designation shall be based on the criteria as established by the United States environmental protection agency for determining discharge/no discharge waters regarding marine sanitation devices. Any such discharge of sewage from a vessel shall be prima facie evidence that the discharge was done by the operator, or owner if the operator cannot be determined, of such vessel; further, where such discharges are allowed under the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and its implementing regulations, United States coast guard approved Type I and Type II marine sanitation devices are the only acceptable discharge treatment devices that may be used on the waters of this state, except that only Type II discharge devices may be used on vessels over sixty-five feet (65') in length unless otherwise provided by rule or regulation. The agency may establish by rule and regulation a system of inspection for compliance to be conducted by a properly trained, qualified and bonded private individual. This system shall in no way affect inspections as permitted under § 69-9-220.

Any person or persons affected by a decision of the agency may appeal such decision to the commission.

Acts 1965, ch. 334, §§ 13, 14, 16; 1977, ch. 305, § 1; 1979, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-2213, 70-2214, 70-2216; Acts 1989, ch. 92, §§ 4-6; 1991, ch. 218, § 2; 1992, ch. 601, § 2; 1995, ch. 39, §§ 1-6; 1998, ch. 1008, § 1; 2000, ch. 830, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-216; Acts 2005, ch. 181, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 185, § 11.

Cross-References. Arrest without warrant, §69-9-220.

Penalties for Class A and Class C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

Penalties for violation of this section, §§40-35-111,69-9-219.

Reporting boating accidents, §69-9-210.

Sewage disposal, §69-9-102.

Vandalism of property, §39-14-408.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489.